Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3103
Order; return to demanding court.

The county attorney shall appear at the hearing and report to the judicial officer the results of his investigation. If the judicial officer finds that the affiant is a designated agent of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate and that the person whose removal is sought was released from custody by the demanding court, judge, or magistrate, and that the person has violated the terms or conditions of his release, the judicial officer shall issue an order authorizing the return of the person to the custody of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate forthwith.

Laws 1969, c. 228, § 3, p. 853.